Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.050

City manager—Bond and oath.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office the city manager shall take the official oath for the support of the government and the faithful performance of his or her duties and shall execute and file with the clerk of the council a bond in favor of the city or town in such sum as may be fixed by the council.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2021; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.050. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 5; prior: 1943 c 271 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-21, part.]